en: natural blackcurrant flavouring
da: naturlig solbær aroma
de: natürliches Cassisaroma
es: aroma natural de grosella negra
fi: luontainen mustaherukka-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de cassis
hr: prirodna aroma crnog ribiza
hu: természetes fekete ribizli aroma
it: aroma naturale di ribes nero
nb: naturlig smak fra solbær
nl: natuurlijk cassisaroma
pl: naturalny aromat czarnej porzeczki
sv: naturlig svartvinbärssmak

en: natural apricot flavouring, natural apricot flavor
de: natürliches Aprikosenaroma, natürliches Aprikosen-Aroma, natürlicher Aprikosengeschmack
es: aroma natural de albaricoque
fi: luontainen aprikoosiaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'abricot
hr: prirodna aroma marelice
hu: természetes sárgabarack aroma
it: Aroma naturale all'albicocca

en: strawberry flavouring
bg: ароматизант ягода
de: Erdbeergeschmack
es: Saborizante de fresa
fi: mansikka-aromi
fr: arôme de fraise
hr: aroma jagode
hu: eper aroma
it: Aroma di fragola
nl: aardbeienaroma
pl: aromat truskawkowy

en: strawberry flavoured cream
es: crema sabor fresa
fi: mansikkamaustettu kerma
fr: crème aromatisée à la fraise
hr: krema okusa jagode
hu: eper ízesítésű krém
it: crema aromatizzata alla fragola
nl: aardbeienroom
pl: śmietanka o smaku truskawkowym

en: natural strawberry flavouring
de: natürliches Erdbeeraroma
es: Saborizante natural de fresa
fi: luontainen mansikka-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de fraise
hr: prirodna aroma jagode
hu: természetes eper aroma
it: aroma naturale di fragola
nl: natuurlijk aardbeienaroma
pl: naturalny aromat truskawkowy

en: natural raspberry flavouring
de: natürliches Himbeeraroma
es: Saborizante de frambuesa natural
fi: luontainen vadelma-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de framboise
hr: prirodna aroma maline
hu: természetes málna aroma
it: Aroma naturale di lampone
pl: naturalny aromat malinowy

en: natural raspberry flavouring with other natural flavourings
it: aroma naturale di lampone con altri aromi naturali
pl: naturalny aromat malinowy z innymi aromatami

en: natural pepper flavouring, natural pepper flavor, natural pepper flavors
de: natürliches Pfefferaroma
es: Saborizante natural de pimiento
fi: luontainen pippuriaromi, luontaiset pippuriaromit, luontaisia pippuriaromeja
fr: arôme naturel de poivre, arôme naturel poivre, arômes naturels de poivre
hr: prirodna aroma papra
hu: természetes bors aroma
it: aroma naturale di pepe
pl: naturalny aromat pieprzu

en: natural laurel flavouring
de: natürliches Lorbeeraroma, natürliches Lorbeer-Aroma
es: sabor natural laurel, sabor natural a laurel, sabor natural de laurel
fi: luontainen laakerinlehtiaromi
fr: arôme naturel de laurier, arome naturel de laurier
hr: prirodna aroma lovora
hu: természetes babér aroma
it: aroma naturale di alloro
pt: aroma natural de louro

en: natural paprika flavor, natural flavor of paprika
de: natürlicher Paprikageschmack
fi: luontainen paprika-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de paprika
hr: prirodna aroma paprike
hu: természetes paprika aroma
it: aroma naturale di paprika
pl: naturalny aromat papryki

en: natural sunflower oil flavouring
sv: naturlig solrosoljearom

fr: arôme naturel de poivre avec autres arômes naturels
fi: luontainen pippuriaromi ja muut luontaiset aromit

en: natural spice flavouring
de: natürliches Gewürzaroma
fi: luontainen maustearomi
fr: arôme naturel d'épices
hr: prirodna aroma začina
hu: természetes fűszer aroma, természetes fűszeraroma
it: aroma di spezie naturali
sv: naturlig krydderi aroma

en: natural turmeric flavouring, natural flavor of turmeric
de: natürlicher Kurkumageschmack, natürlicher Kurkuma-Geschmack, natürlicher Curcumageschmack, natürlicher Curcuma-Geschmack
es: aroma natural de cúrcuma
fi: luontainen kurkuma-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de curcuma
hr: prirodni okus kurkume
hu: természetes kurkuma aroma
it: aroma naturale di curcuma

en: natural cocoa flavouring, natural cocoa flavour
de: natürliches Kakaoaroma
el: φυσικό άρωμα κακάο
es: aroma natural de cacao
fi: luontainen kaakaoaromi
fr: arôme naturel de cacao
hr: prirodna aroma kakaa
hu: természetes kakaó aroma
it: aroma naturale di cacao
nl: natuurlijk cacao-aroma
pl: naturalny aromat kakaowy

en: cocoa flavouring, cocoa flavour
bg: аромат на какао
da: kakaosmag
de: Kakaoaroma
es: aroma de cacao
fi: kaakaoaromi
fr: arôme de cacao
hr: aroma kakaa
hu: kakaó aroma
it: aroma di cacao
nl: cacao-aroma
pl: aromat kakaowy
pt: aroma de cacau

fr: arôme naturel de moutarde
de: natürliches Senfaroma
es: sabor natural de mostaza
fi: luontainen sinappiaromi
hu: természetes mustár aroma
it: aroma naturale di senape
nl: natuurlijk mosterd aroma

fr: arôme naturel de romarin
de: natürliches Rosmarinaroma
es: sabor natural de romero
fi: luontainen rosmariiniaromi
hu: természetes rozmaring aroma
it: aroma naturale di rosmarino
nl: natuurlijk rozemarijn aroma
pl: naturalny aromat rozmarynu

en: natural basil flavouring
de: natürliches Basilikumaroma
es: sabor albahaca natural, sabor natural albahaca
fi: luontainen basilika-aromi
fr: arôme naturel de basilic
hr: prirodna aroma bosiljka
hu: természetes bazsaliom aroma
it: aroma naturale del basilico, aroma naturale di basilico
pl: naturalny aromat bazylii

de: natürliches Kaffee-Aroma
es: sabor natural de café
fi: luontainen kahviaromi
fr: arôme naturel de café
hu: természetes kávé aroma
it: aroma naturale di caffè
nl: natuurlijk koffie aroma
pl: naturalny aromat kawy
pt: sabor natural de café